Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20202-4107
Commission; members; removal.

A member of the commission may be removed by the Governor for cause. He or she shall first be given a written copy of the cause or causes for removal and an opportunity to be heard publicly. In addition to all other causes, a member ceasing to (1) be a resident of the state, (2) live in the district from which he or she was appointed, or (3) be actually engaged in growing dry peas and lentils in the state shall be deemed a sufficient cause for removal from the commission.

Laws 2020, LB803, § 7.
November 14, 2020